New York, session 2025-2026, A9473.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the 2 public health law relating to defining enforcement officers in a city 3 with a population of one million or more for the purposes of regulating 4 tobacco products, herbal cigarettes and smoking paraphernalia, as 5 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5624 and A. 8468, is amended to 6 read as follows: 7 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] six months after it 8 shall have become a law. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10319-02-6